Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.130

Unprofessional conduct.

The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for any certificate holder or applicant under the jurisdiction of this chapter:

(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of court reporting, whether or not the act constitutes a crime. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a condition precedent to disciplinary action;

(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in obtaining or in seeking reinstatement of a certificate;

(3) Advertising in a false, fraudulent, or misleading manner;

(4) Incompetence or negligence;

(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's certificate, registration, or license to practice court reporting by a regulatory authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction;

(6) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative rule regulating the profession;

(7) Failure to cooperate in an inquiry, investigation, or disciplinary action by:

(a) Not furnishing papers or documents;

(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation of the matter contained in the complaint filed with the director;

(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the director, regardless of whether the recipient of the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding;

(8) Failure to comply with an order issued by the director or an assurance of discontinuance entered into with the director;

(9) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession;

(10) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the practice of the profession. For the purpose of this subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW.

[ 1995 c 27 s 12; 1989 c 382 s 14.]